Washington statutes.
RCW 39.50.060

Nonvoted general indebtedness.

A municipal corporation may incur nonvoted general indebtedness under this chapter up to an amount which, when added to all other authorized and outstanding nonvoted indebtedness of the municipal corporation, is equal to the maximum amount of indebtedness the municipal corporation is otherwise permitted to incur without a vote of the electors.

[ 1982 c 216 s 7.]